Utah statutes.
78A-5-106.   Presiding judge -- Associate presiding judge -- Election -- Term -- Compensation -- Powers -- Duties.

(1)  In judicial districts having more than one judge, the district court judges shall elect one judge of the district to the office of presiding judge.

(2)  In judicial districts having more than two judges, the district court judges may elect one judge of the district to the office of associate presiding judge.

(3)  In districts having five or more full-time judges, court commissioners, referees, or hearing officers, the presiding judge shall receive an additional $2,000 per annum as compensation.

(4)  In districts having 10 or more full-time judges, court commissioners, referees, or hearing officers, the associate presiding judge shall receive an additional $2,000 per annum as compensation.

(5)  The presiding judge has the following authority and responsibilities, consistent with the policies of the Judicial Council:

(a)  implementing policies of the Judicial Council; and

(b)  exercising powers and performing administrative duties as authorized by the Judicial Council.

(6)  When the presiding judge is unavailable, the associate presiding judge shall assume the responsibilities of the presiding judge.  The associate presiding judge shall perform other duties assigned by the presiding judge.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

